en: Pumpkin seed oils
bg: Олио от тиквени семки
de: Kürbiskernöle
es: Aceites de semillas de calabaza
fi: Kurpitsansiemenöljyt
fr: Huiles de pépins de courge
hr: Ulja sjemenki bundeve
it: Olio di semi di zucca
lt: Moliūgų sėklų aliejus
nl: Pompoenzaadoliën, Pompoenpitoliën

en: Rapeseed oils, Colza oils
bg: Рапично олио
de: Rapsöle
es: Aceites de colza
fi: rypsiöljyt
fr: Huiles de colza, huile de colza
hr: Repičina ulja
it: Olio di colza
lt: Rapsų aliejai
nl: Koolzaadoliën
pl: Olej rzepakowy, Oleje rzepakowe
sv: Rovoljor, Rapsoljor, rapsolja

en: Butter oil or concentrated butter
fr: Huile de beurre, Beurre concentré
hr: Maslac ulje ili koncentrirani maslac
ja: バターオイル
lt: Sviesto aliejus arba koncentruotas sviestas
nl: Boteroliën
pt: Óleo de manteiga ou concentrado de manteiga

en: Paraffin oil
fr: Huile de paraffine
hr: Parafinsko ulje
lt: Parafino aliejus

en: British oils and fats
fr: Huiles et graisses britanniques
hr: Britanska ulja i masti
lt: Britiški aliejai ir riebalai

en: Austrian oils and fats
fr: Huiles et graisses autrichiennes
hr: Austrijska ulja i masti
lt: Austriški aliejai ir riebalai

en: Croatian oils and fats
fr: Huiles et graisses croates
hr: Hrvatska ulja i masti
lt: Kroatiški aliejai ir riebalai

en: Canola oils
bg: Олио от канола
de: Canola-öle
es: Aceites de canola
fr: Huiles de canola
hr: Ulja repice
it: Olio di canola
nl: Raapoliën

en: Safflower oils
de: Distelöle, Safloröle
es: Aceites de cártamo
fr: Huiles de carthame, Huile de carthame
hr: Ulja šafranike
it: Olio di cartamo
ja: サフラワー油, 紅花油
lt: Dygminų aliejus
nl: Saffloeroliën

en: Sunflower oils, Sunflower oil
bg: Слънчогледово олио
ca: Oli de gira-sol
da: Solsikkeolier
de: Sonnenblumenöle
es: Aceites de girasol, Aceite de girasol
fi: Auringonkukkaöljyt
fr: Huiles de tournesol
hr: Suncokretova ulja
hu: Napraforgóolajok
it: Olio di girasole, Olio di semi di girasole
ja: ひまわり油
lt: Saulėgrąžų aliejai, Saulėgrąžų aliejus
nl: Zonnebloemoliën, Zonnebloemolie
pl: Olej słonecznikowy, Olej ze słonecznika
pt: Óleos de girasol
ro: Ulei de floarea soarelui
ru: Масло подсолнечное, Подсолнечное масло
sv: Solrosoljor, Solrosolja
tr: Ayçiçek yağı, Ayçiçeği yağı
zh: 葵花籽油

en: Nonrefined sunflower oils, unrefined sunflower oils
bg: Шарлан, Нерафинирано слънчогледово масло
hr: Nerafinirana suncokretova ulja
lt: Nerafinuoti saulėgrąžų aliejai, Nerafinuotas saulėgrąžų aliejus
ru: Масло подсолнечное нерафинированное

en: Refined sunflower oils
de: Raffinierte Sonnenblumenöle
es: Aceites de girasol refinados
fr: Huiles de tournesol raffinées
hr: Rafinirana suncokretova ulja
it: Oli di girasole raffinati
lt: Rafinuoti saulėgrąžų aliejai
nl: Geraffineerde zonnebloemoliën
ru: Масло подсолнечное рафинированное

en: Refined deodorized sunflower oils
de: Raffinierte, desodorierte Sonnenblumenöle
es: Aceites de girasol refinados y desodorizados
fr: Huiles de tournesol raffinées et désodorisées
hr: Rafinirana dezodorirana suncokretova ulja
it: Oli di girasole raffinati e deodorati
lt: Rafinuoti dezodoruoti saulėgrąžų aliejai
nl: Geraffineerde gedesodoriseerde zonnebloemoliën
ru: Масло подсолнечное рафинированное дезодорированное

en: High oleic sunflower oils
de: High-Oleic-Sonnenblumenöle, Sonnenblumenöle mit hohem Ölsäuregehalt
es: Aceites de girasol alto oleico
fr: Huiles de tournesol riches en acide oléique, huiles de tournesol oléiques
it: Oli di girasole alto oleico
nl: High oleic zonnebloemoliën
sv: Solrosolja med hög oljesyrahalt, höoljesyrehaltiga solrosoljor

en: Tea seed oils
es: Aceites de camelia
fr: Huiles de théier
hr: Ulja sjemenki čaja
ja: 椿油
lt: Arbatos sėklų aliejai
nl: Theeplantoliën
zh: 茶籽油

en: Fried plant-based foods
es: Fritos de origen vegetal, Alimentos de origen vegetal fritos, Vegetales fritos
fi: Paistetut kasvipohjaiset ruoat
fr: Fritures végétales
hr: Pržene biljne namirnice
it: Alimenti vegetali fritti, Cibi vegetali fritti
lt: Keptas augalinis maistas
nl: Gefrituurde plantaardige producten

en: Flakes
ca: Flocs, grans enrotllats
de: Getreideflocken
es: Copos
fi: hiutaleet
fr: Flocons
hr: pahuljice
hu: Pelyhek
it: Fiocchi
lt: Dribsniai
nl: Vlokken
pl: Płatki
pt: Flocos
ru: Хлопья

en: Rolled flakes, Rolled grains
de: Gerollte Flocken, gerollte Körner
fr: Flocons laminés
hr: Uvaljane pahuljice
it: Fiocchi pressati
nl: Geplette granen

en: Extruded flakes
da: Ekstruderede flager
de: Extrudierte Flocken
fr: Flocons extrudés
hr: Ekstrudirane pahuljice
it: fiocchi estrusi
lt: Ekstruduoti dribsniai
pl: Płatki ekstrudowane
ru: Экструдированные хлопья

en: Starches, Starch
bg: Нишестета
de: Stärke
es: Almidones
fi: tärkkelykset
fr: Amidons, fécules
hr: Škrobovi
it: Amidi
lt: Krakmolas
nl: Zetmelen
pl: Skrobia, Skrobie
tr: Nişasta